Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 3. Legislative Department
§ 24. Bill to contain only one subject, which shall be expressed in title.

No bill, except general appropriation bills and bills for the codification and general revision of the laws, shall be passed containing more than one subject, which shall be clearly expressed in its title; but if any subject is embraced in any act which is not expressed in the title, such act shall be void only as to so much thereof as shall not be so expressed.

I. General Consideration.

II. Illustrative Cases.

I.General Consideration.

Cross references. —

For provision that tax must be authorized by law and law must state object to which it shall be applied, see art. 15, § 13, Wyo. Const.

Purpose of section. —

The object of this provision is well understood. It was to prevent surprise or fraud in legislation by means of provisions in bills of which the titles gave no intimation. English v. Smith, 71 Wyo. 1, 253 P.2d 857,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1953); Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962); Morrow v. Diefenderfer, 384 P.2d 601,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1963); Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963); Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

The purpose of this constitutional provision is to prevent surprise or fraud in legislation. State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

This section's purpose is the informing of interested persons as to the legislation passed. Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962).

The purpose of the constitutional provision that no bill shall be passed containing more than one subject, which shall be clearly expressed in its title, is to prevent surprise or fraud in legislation. Weiss v. State, 455 P.2d 904,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1969), cert. denied, 398 U.S. 927, 90 S. Ct. 1815, 26 L. Ed. 2d 89, 1970 U.S. LEXIS 1748 (U.S. 1970).

Two purposes are served by this section: first, the prevention of fraud or surprise that could result if provisions contained in the body of a bill were not reflected in a general way in the title itself, and second, to prevent the combination in the same bill or initiative of unrelated and separate subjects that have nothing to do with the subject of the original legislation. Wyoming Nat'l Abortion Rights Action League v. Karpan, 881 P.2d 281,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1994).

Intent of section. —

This section was not intended to apply to amendments of general statutes consolidated into a code, but was aimed at the separate acts in their original enactment; in the case of amendments to a code it is sufficient that the title refer to the chapter and section specifically, and declare the purpose to amend or supplement it. Board of Comm'rs v. Stone, 7 Wyo. 280, 51 P. 605,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1898); In re Trent's Claim, 68 Wyo. 146, 231 P.2d 180,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1951), overruled, Bowers v. Wyoming State Treasurer, 593 P.2d 182,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1979).

Construction of section. —

This section must be liberally and reasonably construed. State ex rel. Wyckoff v. Ross, 31 Wyo. 500, 228 P. 636,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1924); Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962).

This section must be reasonably construed, for a narrow construction would impede legislation to such a degree that none but a precisian could successfully draft a valid enactment. Morrow v. Diefenderfer, 384 P.2d 601,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1963).

The words contained in this section are not rigid or inflexible but must be subject to interpretation in the light of all circumstances. Morrow v. Diefenderfer, 384 P.2d 601,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1963).

Reasonable adherence for compliance. —

All that is necessary for compliance with this provision of the constitution is a reasonable adherence thereto. Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962).

Section not applicable to territorial legislation. —

This section, providing that, if any subject is embraced in any act which is not expressed in the title, such act shall be void only as to the part thereof not so expressed, was not retroactive, and hence did not apply to territorial statutes. State v. Smart, 22 Wyo. 154, 136 P. 452,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1913).

Section requires only that all provisions be germane to subject expressed in title. —

This section does not intend that the title shall be an abstract of all the various provisions of a bill, nor does it prevent the incorporation in a single act of the entire statutory law upon one general subject; it requires only that every provision must be germane to the subject expressed in the title. Board of Comm'rs v. Stone, 7 Wyo. 280, 51 P. 605,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1898).

This section was not intended to prevent the incorporation into a single act of the entire statutory law upon 1 general subject, but only that every provision must be germane to the subject expressed in the title. Weiss v. State, 455 P.2d 904,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1969), cert. denied, 398 U.S. 927, 90 S. Ct. 1815, 26 L. Ed. 2d 89, 1970 U.S. LEXIS 1748 (U.S. 1970).

If but one general and comprehensive subject is contained in an act, and all of the provisions are germane to that subject, then the act cannot be said to violate either the spirit or the letter of this section. State v. Pitet, 69 Wyo. 478, 243 P.2d 177,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1952).

Subject in a bill may be as comprehensive as the legislature chooses to make it;

it may include innumerable minor subjects, provided all the minor subjects, when combined, form only one general subject or topic. State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

This constitutional provision should not be so construed as to prevent the legislature from embracing in one act all matter properly connected with one general subject. State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

Duplicity of subject. —

In order to constitute duplicity of subject, an act must embrace two or more dissimilar and discordant subjects, that by no fair intendment can be considered as having any legitimate connection with or relation to each other. State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

Provisions beyond subject expressed are inoperative. —

Those provisions which are beyond the subject, as expressed in the title, must be held to be inoperative, since the general public would not be put upon notice of the contents of the act from a reading of the title. Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

Generality of title. —

The title of an act of the legislature may be sufficiently general and comprehensive to embrace every means and end necessary or convenient for the accomplishment of the general purpose expressed therein. Public Serv. Comm'n v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 158, 53 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1935); Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962); State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

The means, methods and instrumentalities for carrying out a general purpose need not be expressed in the title of an act. State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

The title of a bill need not encompass all of the aspects of the statute which follows and every person or thing therein affected need not be delineated. Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962); State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

Attempted delineation of details and a departure from a more general statement can often result in a bad title. State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

Legislature may make title as restrictive as it pleases. —

Since the legislature may make the title to an act as restrictive as it pleases, it is obvious that it may sometimes so frame a title as to preclude matters which might with entire propriety have been embraced, but which must be excluded because the title is unnecessarily restrictive. Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963); State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

And the courts cannot enlarge the scope of the title.

Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963); State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

Specific title will not be liberally interpreted. —

If a title is specific, it is not entitled to the liberal interpretation which would prevail otherwise. Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

Title need not be abstract of bill. —

It was not intended that the title should be an abstract of all the various provisions that a bill might contain. Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962); State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

But the title should not be misleading or give rise to surprise or deception.

Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

Reference to section to be amended is adequate if amendment is germane. —

A reference in the title to the section to be amended, although not specifying the nature of the amendment, is adequate, where the subject matter of the actual amendment is “germane” to that of the provision amended — the theory being that the reader of the bill will get enough information by looking at the earlier law and the caption of the amendatory bill. Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

If the matter contained in an amendatory or supplementary act is germane to the original act, a reference in the title to the section of the statute to be amended or supplemented accurately indicates the general subject of the legislation and is not in violation of the constitutional provision requiring a clear expression of such subject. Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

A reference in the title of the amending act to the section or sections of the statute to be amended by number accurately indicates the general subject of the legislation to be affected by the amendment, and is not in violation of this section, if the new matters contained in the amended sections are germane to the subject of the original sections. Morrow v. Diefenderfer, 384 P.2d 601,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1963).

But amendment is limited to matters specified. —

When a title particularizes the changes which are to be made in an amendatory act, the legislation is limited to matters specified. Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

If the nature of an amendment is actually specified and the title of the bill indicates that a particular change in the original act is proposed, the title cannot be construed to include all matters germane to the original act. Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

While a title need not set out the nature of the changes made, if it does, the body of the amendatory act may not contain any other matter, however germane it may be to the subject of the original act as a whole. Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

And anything beyond this limitation would be void

regardless of how germane it might be to the subject of the original act. Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

Scope of judicial review. —

The objections should be grave, and the conflict between the act and the constitutional palpable, before the judiciary should disregard or annul a legislative enactment upon the sole ground that it embraces more than one subject, or, when it contains but one subject, on the ground that it is not sufficiently expressed in its title. English v. Smith, 71 Wyo. 1, 253 P.2d 857,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1953); Morrow v. Diefenderfer, 384 P.2d 601,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1963).

The court must scrutinize an amending act to see whether there is a common tie between the provisions, permitting the object and purpose of the amendment, or whether it introduces new subject matter not within the purview of existing legislation. Morrow v. Diefenderfer, 384 P.2d 601,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1963).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Fawcett v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 69, 273 P.2d 188,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1954); Markey v. Connelly, 367 P.2d 964,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1962); Forest Oil Corp. v. Davis, 384 P.2d 716,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 1963).

Quoted

in

In re West Hwy. San. & Imp. Dist., 77 Wyo. 384, 317 P.2d 495,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1957); Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1959); Munson v. State, 770 P.2d 1093,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Hynds v. Cahill, 12 Wyo. 225, 75 P. 433,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1904); Littleton v. Burgess, 13 Wyo. 261, 79 P. 922,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1905); State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1909); State ex rel. Jamison v. Forsyth, 21 Wyo. 359, 133 P. 521,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1913); State v. Wells, 29 Wyo. 335, 212 P. 1099,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1923); State ex rel. Van Patten v. Ellis, 37 Wyo. 124, 259 P. 812,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(1927); Ziegler v. Pickett, 46 Wyo. 283, 25 P.2d 391,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1933); Travis v. Estate of Travis, 79 Wyo. 329, 334 P.2d 508,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1959); Bondurant v. Board of Trustees, 354 P.2d 219,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1960); Hansen v. Smith, 395 P.2d 944,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1964); Zanetti Riverton Bus Lines v. State Bd. of Equalization, 485 P.2d 387,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1971).

Law reviews. —

For article, “How to Draft a Bill,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 285.

II.Illustrative Cases.

Acts held to contain one subject. —

An act changing and regulating the grand jury system by reducing the number of grand jurors, and by providing that a grand jury shall be summoned only when ordered by court, and also providing for prosecution by information and the procedure thereunder, is not unconstitutional, as containing more than one subject. In re Boulter, 5 Wyo. 329, 40 P. 520,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1895).

“An act providing for the supervision and use of waters of the state,” is not invalid, as containing more than one subject clearly expressed in the title. Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

“An act creating the office of state inspector of coal mines, fixing said inspector's salary and prescribing his duties, also providing for the proper ventilation of coal mines and for other purposes, and providing for appropriating moneys for a contingent fund for said office” was not unconstitutional, as embracing more than one subject. Koppala v. State, 15 Wyo. 398, 89 P. 576,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1907), reh'g denied, 15 Wyo. 398, 93 P. 662,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1908).

An act providing for the organization of new counties and the location of county seats therein temporarily treats of but one general subject. Board of Comm'rs v. Woods, 18 Wyo. 316, 106 P. 923,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 316, 107 P. 753,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1910).

Act held to embrace 2 objects. —

Aside from the fact that ch. 194, Laws 1963, as passed, contains provisions beyond the subject expressed in its title, it also appears that both the title and the body of the act itself embrace two distinct objects, in contravention of this section, namely: (1) that of providing for a liquor purchase identification card; and (2) that of amending W.S. 1957, § 12-5. Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

Sufficiency of title. —

“An act to define the judicial districts of the state and prescribing the time for holding the terms of the district court in the several counties of each judicial district” sufficiently expressed the subject matter of the act. In re Board of Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 133, 32 P. 850 (Wyo. 1893).

An act designated as an act to amend and reenact a specified section of a code “in such manner as to repeal all limitations arising under contract not in writing, either expressed or implied, shall be brought within 8 years after the cause of action accrues” was not invalid under this section. Board of Comm'rs v. Stone, 7 Wyo. 280, 51 P. 605,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1898).

Subject of amendatory statute relating to dipping of sheep was embraced within title. State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1920).

Where title recited that certain sections were to be amended and others repealed relating to gambling games, the provisions of this section were not violated. State v. Tobin, 31 Wyo. 355, 226 P. 681,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1924).

Statutory provision for abatement of liquor nuisance and for injunction was not invalid as containing subject not expressed in the title to the act. Tucker v. State, 35 Wyo. 430, 251 P. 460,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1926).

Act amending statutory provisions requiring publication of legal notices in newspaper established for a year is not void because of defective or restrictive title, including amended section. In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Provision for preference contained in “An act to expedite and simplify the collection and payment by banks of checks and other instruments for the payment of money” was sufficiently embraced in title, as giving such preference is at least one of the means to further and accomplish the main purpose or one of the main purposes of the act. In re Riverton State Bank, 48 Wyo. 372, 49 P.2d 637,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1935).

No one who read the title to ch. 93, Laws 1955, and was thus aware of the passage of the law could reasonably claim to have been misled since the statement by fair implication advised all citizens that inclusive rules and regulations for fire protection would be adopted. Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962).

The fact that the title of ch. 204, Laws 1957, did not mention the right of a representative of a deceased spouse to elect to take against a will would not invalidate it under this section since the subject matter of the amended section is germane to the election rights of surviving spouses contained in the original section. Morrow v. Diefenderfer, 384 P.2d 601,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1963).

The title to ch. 91, Laws 1965, “An act concerning the refunding of public securities” embraces the subject of the advance escrow-type refunding provisions of said act in all particulars and expresses said subject with sufficient clarity so as to comply with this section. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

The one general subject involved in ch. 66, Laws 1963, is the abatement of public nuisances, and the title to the act so states. Weiss v. State, 455 P.2d 904,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1969), cert. denied, 398 U.S. 927, 90 S. Ct. 1815, 26 L. Ed. 2d 89, 1970 U.S. LEXIS 1748 (U.S. 1970).

Where the purpose of the initiative was to discourage abortions, which was reflected in the short title of the bill, the “Wyoming Human Life Protection Act” and where the language of the initiative, criminalizing abortion in most instances and withholding state funding for abortions under certain circumstances, fit within the single-subject rule, the title of the initiative adequately expressed the substantive provisions included within the body of the initiative. Wyoming Nat'l Abortion Rights Action League v. Karpan, 881 P.2d 281,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1994).

Section

7-13-301

(placing guilty, unconvicted, person on probation) was constitutionally enacted

in compliance with
Wyo. Const., art. 3, §§ 20 and
24.
Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. Nov. 9, 1990);
Mollman v. State, 800 P.2d 466,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1990);
Hudson v. State, 800 P.2d 471,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1990);
Heggen v. State, 800 P.2d 475,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1990);
Cambio v. State, 800 P.2d 482,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1990).

Section

14-2-203

is constitutional.

Mahaney v. Hunter Enters., 426 P.2d 442,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1967).

Industrial Development Projects Act is constitutional.

Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); Powers v. Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967), reh'g denied, 436 P.2d 961,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1968).

Sections

27-10-101

to

27-10-109

, pertaining to collective bargaining for fire fighters,

do not violate this section.
State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

§ 25. Vote required to pass bill.

No bill shall become a law except by a vote of a majority of all the members elected to each house, nor unless on its final passage the vote taken by ayes and noes, and the names of those voting be entered on the journal.

Cross references. —

As to approval or veto of legislation by governor and as to passage over veto, see art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.

Court may examine journals to determine whether act was constitutionally passed. —

It is duty of the court, where an act is questioned, to examine the legislative journals to determine whether or not such act was passed by a majority of the members elected to each house, that being a matter which the constitution requires to be shown by the journals. State ex rel. Cheyenne v. Swan, 7 Wyo. 166, 51 P. 209,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1897).

The enrolled bill as signed by the officers of the legislature and the governor is not conclusive on the courts, and the legislative journals may be consulted to determine whether the act has been passed in conformity with the constitutional requirements. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Wright, 62 Wyo. 112, 163 P.2d 190,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1945).

Effect of erroneous journal entry. —

Though a journal entry on passage of an act is insufficient, the court is not limited by recital of a single journal entry when upon construing all entries together it is manifest such single entry is erroneous. Arbuckle v. Pflaeging, 20 Wyo. 351, 123 P. 918,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1912).

Law reviews. —

For article, “How to Draft a Bill,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 285.

§ 26. How laws revised, amended or extended.

No law shall be revised or amended, or the provisions thereof extended by reference to its title only, but so much thereof as is revised, amended, or extended, shall be re-enacted and published at length.

Cross references. —

For provision that tax must be authorized by law and law must state object to which it shall be applied, see art. 15, § 13, Wyo. Const.

Purpose of section. —

The purpose of this section was to prevent ill-advised and fraudulent legislation. State v. Pitet, 69 Wyo. 478, 243 P.2d 177,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1952); Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

The constitutional restriction in this section was aimed at the mischief of embracing in the same bill before a legislative body incongruous matters having no relation to each other or to the subject specified in the title, by which laws were often adopted without attracting attention. State v. Pitet, 69 Wyo. 478, 243 P.2d 177,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1952); Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Section requires reasonable interpretation. —

This section must be given an interpretation that is reasonable having in mind always the evils that are to be suppressed and with a view of sustaining the legislative action. State v. Pitet, 69 Wyo. 478, 243 P.2d 177,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1952).

This section does not prohibit additions to or extensions of existing statutes.

English v. Smith, 71 Wyo. 1, 253 P.2d 857,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1953).

Reference statutes. —

This section does not apply to statutes which refer to existing laws merely for the purpose of pointing out procedure in executing powers which the statute itself, original in form by its own language, grants, and enforcing rights or discharging duties created or imposed by such statutes. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959); Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Reference to existing laws for the determination of positive and substantial rights thereby conferred or taken away is prohibited. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Use of the reference technique in the last sentence of former § 9-1-134(a)(iii) which provided, “These securities shall meet the procedural requirements and provisions of W. S. 35-136.2 through 35-136.5 [§§

35-2-425

through

35-2-428

] as provided for the issuance of bonds by hospital districts,” is not constitutionally objectionable but makes good sense.
Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977). See
§ 16-1-107(a)(iii).

Applied

in

Long v. State, 745 P.2d 547,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 542

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

In re Trent, 68 Wyo. 146, 231 P.2d 180,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1951).

Cited

in

Littleton v. Burgess, 13 Wyo. 261, 79 P. 922,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1905); Alberts v. State, 745 P.2d 898,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 539

(Wyo. 1987).